Hawaii statutes.
§586-9 Modification of order. Upon
application, notice to all parties, and hearing, the court may modify the terms
of an existing order for protection. The court may deny, without hearing, a
motion to dismiss or to modify the terms of an existing order for protection if
the motion, on its face, does not allege facts sufficient to establish a
material change in the circumstances of the parties since the issuance or last
modification of the order. [L 1982, c 123, pt of §2; am L 2001, c 212, §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next